zh-TW: 直排輪煞車類型: 腳跟煞車; 整合式腳趾煞車; 無煞車; 可拆卸腳跟煞車; 其他
zh-CN: 直排轮滑刹车类型: 后跟刹车; 一体式脚趾刹车; 无刹车; 可拆卸后跟刹车; 其他
en: Inline skate brake type: Heel brake; Integrated toe brake; No brake; Removable heel brake; Other
fr: Type de frein des patins en ligne: Frein au talon; Frein avant intégré; Sans frein; Frein au talon amovible; Autre
bg-BG: Тип спирачка за ролери: Спирачка на петата; Интегрирана предна спирачка; Без спирачка; Сваляща се спирачка на петата; Други
sk-SK: Typ brzdy na kolieskových korčuliach: Pätová brzda; Integrovaná špičková brzda; Bez brzdy; Odnímateľná pätová brzda; Iné
el: Τύπος φρένου inline πατινιών (ρόλερ): Φρένο φτέρνας; Ενσωματωμένο φρένο μύτης; Χωρίς φρένο; Αφαιρούμενο φρένο φτέρνας; Άλλο
fi: Rullaluistinten jarrutyyppi: Kantajarru; Integroitu kärkijarru; Ei jarrua; Irrotettava kantajarru; Muu
cs: Typ brzdy pro inline brusle: Patičková brzda; Integrovaná brzda na špičce; Bez brzdy; Odnímatelná patičková brzda; Jiné
ko: 인라인 스케이트 브레이크 타입: 힐 브레이크; 일체형 토 브레이크; 브레이크 없음; 탈착식 힐 브레이크; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de travão para patins em linha: Travão de calcanhar; Travão de ponta integrado; Sem travão; Travão de calcanhar amovível; Outro
nl: Inline skate rem type: Hielrem; Geïntegreerde teenrem; Geen rem; Verwijderbare hielrem; Overige
ru: Тип тормоза роликовых коньков: Пяточный тормоз; Встроенный носовой тормоз; Без тормоза; Съемный пяточный тормоз; Другое
nb: Bremsetype for rulleskøyter: Hælbrems; Integrert tåbrems; Ingen brems; Avtagbar hælbrems; Annet
th: ประเภทเบรกสเก็ตอินไลน์: เบรกส้นเท้า; เบรกปลายเท้าในตัว; ไม่มีเบรก; เบรกส้นเท้าแบบถอดได้; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Patins inline tipo de freio: Freio de calcanhar; Freio de ponta integrado; Sem freio; Freio de calcanhar removível; Outro
pl: Typ hamulca rolek inline: Hamulec piętowy; Zintegrowany hamulec przedni; Brak hamulca; Zdejmowany hamulec piętowy; Inny
vi: Loại phanh giày trượt patin: Phanh gót; Phanh mũi tích hợp; Không phanh; Phanh gót có thể tháo rời; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta zavore za rolerje: Zavora na peti; Vgrajena zavora na prstih; Brez zavore; Odstranljiva zavora na peti; Drugo
lt-LT: Riedučių stabdžio tipas: Kulno stabdys; Integruotas priekinis stabdys; Be stabdžio; Nuimamas kulno stabdys; Kita
sv: Bromstyp för inlines: Hälbroms; Inbyggd tåbroms; Ingen broms; Avtagbar hälbroms; Övrigt
es: Tipo de freno de patines en línea: Freno de talón; Freno de punta integrado; Sin freno; Freno de talón extraíble; Otro
ja: インラインスケート用ブレーキタイプ: ヒールブレーキ; 一体型トーブレーキ; ブレーキなし; 取り外し可能なヒールブレーキ; その他
it: Tipo di freno per pattini in linea: Freno al tallone; Freno in punta integrato; Nessun freno; Freno al tallone rimovibile; Altro
da: Type af bremse til inline-skates: Hælbremse; Indbygget tåbremse; Ingen bremse; Aftagelig hælbremse; Andet
hu: Egysoros görkorcsolya fék típusa: Sarokfék; Beépített orrfék; Nincs fék; Eltávolítható sarokfék; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta kočnice za inline skateboard: Kočnica na peti; Integrirana kočnica na prstima; Bez kočnice; Odvojiva kočnica na peti; Ostalo
de: Typ der Inline-Skate-Bremse: Fersenbremse; Integrierte Zehenbremse; Ohne Bremse; Abnehmbare Fersenbremse; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tipul frânei la rolele în linie: Frână pe călcâi; Frână integrată la vârf; Fără frână; Frână detașabilă pe călcâi; Altele
tr: Sıralı tekerlekli paten fren sistemi türü: Topuk freni; Entegre parmak freni; Fren yok; Çıkarılabilir topuk freni; Diğer